apertium-tr-ky.ky.twol
!"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I}"
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* [ :Cns - [ й: | %{I%}:LabialCns | %{n%}: ] ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ \[ р:0 | п: ] ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ :Cns - [ й: | %{I%}:LabialCns | %{n%}: ] ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ \[ р:0 | п: | %{U%}:* ] ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ :Cns - [ й: | %{I%}:LabialCns | %{n%}: ] ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ [ [ ? - [ %>: %{U%}: ] ] | \[ р:0 | п: |  ] ] ;
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ :Cns - [ й: | %{I%}:LabialCns | %{n%}: ] ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ \[ р:0 | п: | %{U%}:SurVow ]/[ %>: ] ;
!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* [ :Cns - [ й: | %{I%}:LabialCns | %{n%}: ] ] ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - %{e%}: ] ] _ \[ р:0 | п: ] ;
!  where  Vy  in  (  и  ү  и  и  ү  ы  ы  у  у  ы  у  у )
!  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
!           matched ;

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I}"
%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                   ~~[ %{I%}:LabialCns/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ]~~ ;
                            ~~[ %{n%}:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ]~~ ;     ! Avoid conflict with {n} stuff
                                ~~[ й:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ]~~ ;     ! Avoid conflict w y-vowels
!                                        ~~[ %{e%}:0 _ ]~~ ;     ! Avoid conflict with irregular vowel harmony
                            ~~[ %{e%}:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ]~~ ;    ! Avoid conflict w forced vowel harm
                                                ~~[ _ п ]~~ ;   ! Avoid conflict w {I}п stuff
                                                ~~[ _ р:0 ]~~ ; ! Avoid conflict w causative
  where  Vy  in  (  и  ү  и  и  ү  ы  ы  у  у  ы  у  у )
  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
           matched ;


!"Irregular vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I}"
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* %{e%}:0 ]./.[ %>: | [ :0 - %{e%}:0 ] ] _ \[ р:0 | п: ] ;
!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - %{e%}:0 ] ] %{e%}:/%>: _ \[ р:0 | п: ] ;
!  where  Vy  in  (  и  ү  и  и  ү  и  и  ү  ү  и  ү  ү )
!  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
!           matched ;

"Irregular vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I}"
%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel :Cns* %{e%}: ]/[ %>: ] _ ; 
  where  Vy  in  (  и  ү  и  и  ү  и  и  ү  ү  и  ү  ү )
  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
           matched ;


"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {E}" ! should be just like {A}
!Vx:Vy <=> :LastVowel [ :Cns [ :0 | %>: | :Cns ]* | [ :0 | %>: | :Cns ]* :Cns ] _ ; 
!Vx:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNoVow* [ Cns - й ] WildNonPhon* _ ; 
Vx:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ :Cns - й ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ; 
        where Vx         in ( %{E%} %{E%} %{E%} %{E%} %{E%} %{E%} %{E%} %{E%} %{E%} %{E%} %{E%} %{E%} )
              Vy         in (   е     ө     е     е     ө     а     а     о     о     а     а     а   )
              LastVowel  in (   и     ү     е     э     ө     я     а     ё     о     ы     ю     у   )
              matched ; 



!!!!!!!!!!!!   й vowel harmony  !!!!!!!!!!


!"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A} after й"
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNonPhon* й: WildNonPhon* _ ;
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ \%{U%}:* ;
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ \[ ( %>: ) %{U%}: ] ;
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ [ ?* - [ %{U%}: ?* ] ] ;
!!             [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ [ ?* - [ %>: %{U%}: ?* ] ] ;
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ \[ %{U%}: ?* ] ;
!!             [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ \[ %>: %{U%}: ?* ] ;
!!             [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ \[ %{U%}:SurVow ?* ] ;
!!             [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ \[ %>: %{U%}:SurVow ?* ] ;
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ \[ (%>:) %{U%}:SurVow ?* ] ;
!!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ [ [ [ ( ? ) ? ] - [ ( %>: ) %{U%}: ] ] | ? .#. | .#. ];
!%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ( %>: ) \[ %>: | %{U%}: ] ;
!        where Vy  in ( е  ө  е  е  ө  я  я  ё  ё  я  я  я )
!        LastVowel in ( и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
!               matched ;

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A} after й"
%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ; 
                        ~~[ й:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ( %>: ) [ %{U%}: - :YotVow ] ]~~ ;
        where Vy  in ( е  ө  е  е  ө  я  я  ё  ё  я  я  я )
        LastVowel in ( и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
               matched ;


"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {E} after й" ! should be just like {A}
!%{E%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNonPhon* й: WildNonPhon* _ ; 
%{E%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ; 
        where Vy  in ( е  ө  е  е  ө  я  я  ё  ё  я  я  я )
        LastVowel in ( и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
              matched ;

!"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I} after й"
!!%{I%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNonPhon* й: WildNonPhon* _ \п ;
!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ [ :0 - %{n%}:0 ] | %>: ] _ \[ п | %{U%}:* ] ;
!      where Vy  in ( и  ү  и  и  ү  ы  ы  ю  ю  ы  ю  ю )
!      LastVowel in ( и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
!               matched ; 

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I} after й"
%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
!                   ~~[ %{I%}:LabialCns/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ]~~ ;
                            ~~[ %{n%}:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ]~~ ;     ! Avoid conflict with {n} stuff
                            ~~[ %{e%}:/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ]~~ ;    ! Avoid conflict w forced vowel harm
                                                ~~[ _ п ]~~ ;   ! Avoid conflict w {I}п stuff
                                                ~~[ _ %{U%}:* ]~~ ; ! Avoid conflict with infinitive stuff
  where  Vy  in  (  и  ү  и  и  ү  ы  ы  у  у  ы  у  у )
  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
           matched ;


"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {U} after й"
!%{U%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNonPhon* й: WildNonPhon* _ ;
%{U%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
        !where Vy  in ( ү  ү  ү  ү  ү  у  у  ю  ю  у  ю  ю )
        where Vy  in ( ү  ү  ү  ү  ү  ю  ю  ю  ю  ю  ю  ю )
        LastVowel in ( и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
               matched ;

"Deletion of й before yoticised vowels"
!й:0 <=> _ WildNonPhon* :YotVow ;
й:0 <=> _ [ :YotVow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;


!!!!!!!!!!!  {I}п crap !!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I} after й before п in <cv_perf>"
!%{I%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNoVow* й: WildNonPhon* _ п ;
%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ [ :0 - %{e%}: ] | %>: ] _ п ;
                             ~~[ %{e%}:/%>: _ ]~~ ; ! avoid conflict with irregular vowel harmony rule
      where Vy  in ( и  ү  и  и  ү  ы  ы  ю  ю  ы  ю  ю )
      LastVowel in ( и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
               matched ; 

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {I} before п in <cv_perf>"
!%{I%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel - :LowVow ] WildNoVow* [ Cns - [ й: | LabialCns ] ] WildNonPhon* _ п ;
%{I%}:Vy <=> [ [ :LastVowel ] Cns* [ Cns - [ й: | LabialCns ] ] ]/[ :0 | %>: ]  _ п ;
                             ~~[ %{e%}:/%>: _ ]~~ ; ! avoid conflict with irregular vowel harmony rule
  where  Vy  in  (  и  ү  и  и  ү  ы  ы  у  у  ы  у  у )
  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
           matched ;

"Deletion of all the other {I}s in {I}п <cv_perf>"
%{I%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow - м:SurVow ] %>: _ п ;

!!"Deletion of п at end of verb stem before {I}п <cv_perf>"
!!п:0 <=> :LowVow _ %>: %{I%}: п ;

"Deletion of п at end of verb stem in <cv_perf>"
!!п:0 <=> _ %>: %{I%}:0 п ;
п:0 <=> :LowVow _ %>: %{I%}: п ;
!!п:0 <= :LowVow _ %>: %{I%}: п ;
!!п:0 <=> :LowVow _ %>: %{I%}: п [ :Cns | .#. ] ;

!!"Deletion of {I} after м at end of verb stem in <cv_perf>"
!!!%{I%}:0 <=> :LowVow :0 м %>: _ п ;
!!%{I%}:0 <=> :LowVow м %>: _ п ;

"Shifting of м to where {I} was in <cv_perf>"
%{I%}:м <=> :LowVow м: %>: _ п ;

"{I} to LowVow after LowVow п in <cv_perf>"
%{I%}:Vy <=> :Vx п:0 %>: _ п ;
         where Vx in ( а е э ө о )
               Vy in ( а э э ө о )
               matched;

"{I} to LowVow after LowVow м in <cv_perf>"
м:Vy <=> :Vx _ %>: %{I%}:м п ;
         where Vx in ( а е э ө о )
               Vy in ( а э э ө о )
               matched;

"Make е into э when it's part of a long vowel"
е:э <=> _ [ :э ]/[ [ :0 - %{U%}: ] | %>: ] ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!   {U} stuff (harmony, etc)  !!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {U} after consonant"
!Vx:Vy <=> :LastVowel NotVowel:* _ ; 
!Vx:Vy <=> :LastVowel [ :Cns [ :0 | %>: | :Cns ]*  [ :0 | %>: | :Cns ]* | [ :0 | %>: | :Cns ]* :Cns | [ :0 | %>: | :Cns ]* :Cns [ :0 | %>: | :Cns ]* ] _ ; 
!Vx:Vy <=> :LastVowel [ %>: | :0 ]* _ ; 
!Vx:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNoVow* Cns WildNoVow* _ ;
!%{U%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel WildNoVow* [ Cns - й ] WildNonPhon* _ ;
!%{U%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel [ Cns - й ] ]/[ [ :0 - й:0 ] | %>: ] _ ;
%{U%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* [ Cns - й: ] ]/[ [ :0 - й:0 ] | %>: ] _ ;
!        where Vx         in ( %{U%} %{U%} %{U%} %{U%} %{U%} %{U%} %{U%} %{U%} %{U%} %{U%} %{U%} %{U%} )
         where Vy         in (   ү     ү     ү     ү     ү     у     у     у     у     у     у     у   )
               LastVowel  in (   и     ү     е     э     ө     я     а     ё     о     ы     ю     у   )
               matched ; 

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {U} after vowel"
%{U%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel ( %>: [ :0 - й:0 ] ) _ ;
         where Vy         in (   ү     ө     о     о     у     у   )
               LastVowel  in (   ү     ө     ё     о     ю     у   )
               matched ; 

!"Deletion of vowel archiphonemes immediately before archiphoneme {U}{U}"
!!Archiphoneme:0 <=> \[ %{n%}:* | %{y%}:* | й: | :SurVow | ь:ь | %{S%}: | %{U%}: | %{N%}: ] _ ( %>: ) %{U%}: %{U%}: ;
!Archiphoneme:0 <=> [ :Cns - [ %{n%}:* | %{y%}:* | й: | :SurVow | ь:ь | %{S%}: | %{U%}: | %{N%}: ] ] _ ( %>: ) %{U%}: %{U%}: ;
!         where Archiphoneme in ( %{A%} %{I%} )
!			matched;

"{U} deletion after vowel final stem"
%{U%}:0 <=> Vow %>: _ %{U%}: ; 
!%{U%}:0 <=> [ :SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ %{U%}: ; 

!"Assimilate {U} in infinitives"
!!%{U%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel ( %>: :0 ) _ ; 
!%{U%}:Vy <=> :LastVowel _ ; 
!       where LastVowel in (  и    ү     е     э     ө     я     а     ё     о     ы     ю     у  ) 
!                    Vy in (  ү    ү     ө     ө     ө     о     о     о     о     у     у     у  )
!             matched;

"Assimilate {A} archiphoneme before {U} in e.g. negative infinitive"
%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ( %>: ) [ %{U%}: - :YotVow ] ;
  where  Vy  in  (  ө  ө  ө  ө  ө  о  о  о  о  о  о  о )
  LastVowel  in  (  и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ю  у )
           matched;

"Assimilate vowel before {U} in infinitive"
!Vx:Vy <=> _ [ %>: | :0 ]* %{U%}: [ %>: | .#. ] ;
!Vx:Vy <=> _ ( %>: :0 ) %{U%}: ;
Vx:Vy <=> _ [ %{U%}: - :YotVow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;
       where Vx in (  и     е     э     я     а     ы  )
             Vy in (  ү     ө     ө     ё     о     у  ) 
!       where Vx in (  и     ү     е     э     ө     я     а     ё     о     ы     ю     у   )
!             Vy in (  ү     ү     ө     ө     ө     ё     о     ё     о     у     ю     у   ) 
             matched;

!"Assimilate {I} before {U}"
!%{I%}:Vy <=> _ ( %>: ) :SurfaceU ;
!        where SurfaceU in (  ү  у  )
!		              Vx in (  ү  у  )
!              matched;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!  MISC !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

"Passive {l} becomes n after verb stem ending in /l/"
!%{l%}:н <=> л [ %>: %{I%}: | :SurVow %>: %{I%}:0 ] _ ;
%{l%}:н <=> [ л :SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
!%{l%}:н <=> [ :л :SurVow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
!%{l%}:н <=> [ л Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;


!"Digraph ю"
!<[ йу ]> <=> ю ;
!йу<->ю
!й:0 <=> _ :у ;
!у:0 



!!!!!!!!!!!!!  Possessive case stuff !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

!"Deletion of case-initial consonants after {n} (except locative)"
!Cx:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ ;
!        where Cx in ( %{N%} %{G%} )
!		        matched;
!%{N%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ ;

!"Deletion of accusative {I} after {n}>{N}"
!!%{I%}:0 <=> %{n%}:н %>: %{N%}:0 _ .#. ;
!%{I%}:0 <=> [ %{n%}:н ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ .#. ;

"Deletion of accusative {N} after {n}"
!%{N%}:0 <=> %{n%}:н %>: _ %{I%}:0 .#. ;
%{N%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;
